Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-632
Payment cards; terms, defined.

For purposes of this section and sections 28-633 and 28-634:

(1) Encoding machine means an electronic device that is used to encode information onto a payment card;

(2) Merchant means:

(a) An owner or operator of any retail mercantile establishment or any agent, employee, lessee, consignee, officer, director, franchisee, or independent contractor of such owner or operator;

(b) An establishing financial institution as defined in section 8-157.01; or

(c) A person who receives from an authorized user of a payment card, or someone the person believes to be an authorized user, a payment card or information from a payment card, or what the person believes to be a payment card or information from a payment card, as the instrument for obtaining, purchasing, or receiving goods, services, money, or anything else of value from the person;

(3) Payment card means a credit card, charge card, debit card, or any other card that is issued to an authorized card user and that allows the user to obtain, purchase, or receive goods, services, money, or anything else of value from a merchant;

(4) Person means an individual, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other business entity; and

(5) Scanning device means a scanner, a reader, a wireless access device, a radio-frequency identification scanner, near-field communication technology, or any other electronic device that is used to access, read, scan, obtain, memorize, or store, temporarily or permanently, information encoded on a payment card.

Laws 2002, LB 276, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB773, § 1.